src/fst/affixes/kawe-verb-pref.lexc
!! Verbal prefixes

LEXICON VerbPrefixes

 TemporalPrefix  ;
<0:[teMarker {te}] "@P.RequireTe.On@"> TePrefix  ; !! this is a verb with the dualistic te-prefix
<0:[niMarker {ni}] "@P.RequireNi.On@"> TemporalPrefix  ; !! this is a verb with the quantitative ni-prefix

LEXICON TePrefix    

FuturePrefix    ;
CondPrefix  ;
PronomPrefix    ;

LEXICON TemporalPrefix

FuturePrefix    ;
PastPrefix      ;
PastTePrefix      ; !! Punctual Past for te-verbs: wa + te + pron + verb
CondPrefix  ;
PronomPrefix    ;

LEXICON PastTePrefix
<0:pastPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@" >   DefiniteTePast;

LEXICON DefiniteTePast
< DefPast%+:[{wa'} teMarker {te}] "@P.RequireTe.On@"> PronomPrefix    ;


LEXICON FuturePrefix 
<0:futPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@">   Future;

LEXICON Future
Fut+:en PronomPrefix;


LEXICON CondPrefix
<0:condPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@">   Conditional;

LEXICON Conditional
Cond+:a    PronomPrefix;


LEXICON PastPrefix
<0:pastPref "@U.Aspect.Punct@" "@D.RequireTe@">   DefinitePast;

LEXICON DefinitePast
DefPast+:wa    PronomPrefix;
